Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.903

Conduct associated with initiation into group or pastime or amusement with group—Sanctions adopted by rule.

Institutions of higher education shall adopt rules providing sanctions for conduct associated with initiation into a student organization or living group, or any pastime or amusement engaged in with respect to an organization or living group not amounting to a violation of RCW 28B.10.900. Conduct covered by this section may include embarrassment, ridicule, sleep deprivation, verbal abuse, or personal humiliation.

[ 1993 c 514 s 4.]